South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3848.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 47-5-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (9) "Compendium" means the most current version of the Compendium of Animal Rabies Prevention and Control published by the National Association of State Public Health Veterinarians. SECTION 2.  Section 47-5-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 47-5-60. A pet owner must have his pet inoculated against rabies at a frequency to provide continuous protection of the pet from rabies using a vaccine approved by the department and licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture. The rabies inoculation for pets must be administered by a licensed veterinarian, a certified vaccine technician, as defined in Section 40-69-20, or someone under a licensed veterinarian's direct supervision, as defined in Section 40-69-20. Evidence of rabies inoculation is a certificate signed by a licensed veterinarian or a certified vaccine technician working under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State that includes the name of the supervising veterinarian. The rabies vaccination certificate forms may be provided by the licensed veterinarian or by the department or its designee. The veterinarian or a certified vaccine technician working under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State may stamp or write histhe licensed veterinarian's name and address on the certificate. The certificate must include information recommended by the National Association of State Public Health Veterinarians most recent version of the compendium. The licensed veterinarian administering or supervising the administration of the vaccine, or a certified vaccine technician working under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State, shall provide one copy of the certificate to the owner of the pet and must retain one copy in his files for not less than three years. With the issuance of the certificate, the licensed veterinarian or the certified vaccine technician working under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State shall furnish a serially numbered metal license tag bearing the same number and year as the certificate with the name and telephone number of the veterinarian, veterinary hospital, or practice. The metal license tag at all times must be attached to a collar or harness worn by the pet for which the certificate and tag have been issued. Annually before February first, the veterinarian shall report to the department the number of animals inoculated against rabies during the preceding year. The department, in conjunction with licensed veterinarians, shall promote annual rabies clinics.  The fee for rabies inoculation at these clinics may not exceed ten dollars, including the cost of the vaccine, and this charge must be paid by the pet owner. Fees collected by veterinarians at these clinics are their compensation. SECTION 3.  Section 40-69-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (22) "Certified vaccine technician" means a person trained and certified for this purpose in a vaccine administration training class taught by a licensed South Carolina veterinarian or taught by an individual or entity approved by the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners. The certification must include training in vaccinating pets and six months of experience in vaccinating pets under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian. A person certified pursuant to this item must work under the direct or indirect supervision, as defined in this chapter, and continue to maintain his pruriency by successfully completing a training course every two years taught by a licensed South Carolina veterinarian or taught by an individual or entity approved by the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners. A person certified pursuant to this item must work for a regulated animal control shelter pursuant to Section 40-69-300. SECTION 4.  Chapter 69, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-69-310. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship is not necessary for the administration of vaccines which are approved by the Department of Public Health and licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture so long as the individual administering the rabies vaccine is: (A) a licensed veterinarian; (B) under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian pursuant to the South Carolina Code of Regulations, Chapter 120; or (C) a certified vaccine technician as defined in Section 40-69-20. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----